Wisconsin, session 2025, SB152.
do enact as follows:SB152,14Section 1. 46.87 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB152,2,3546.87 (5) (a) 3. The household meets financial eligibility requirements 1specified in sub. (5m), and persons Persons in the household are ineligible for the 2family care benefit under s. 46.286 in a county in which a care management 3organization under s. 46.284 operates.SB152,24Section 2. 46.87 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB152,2,10546.87 (5) (b) Provide or contract for the provision of services and goods or 6make payments for services to a person with Alzheimer’s disease living in a 7residential facility in the county or in a residential facility associated with the tribe 8or band who meets financial eligibility requirements specified in sub. (5m) and is 9ineligible for the family care benefit under s. 46.286 in a county in which a care 10management organization under s. 46.284 operates.SB152,311Section 3. 46.87 (5m) of the statutes is repealed.SB152,2,1212